Texas, session 892, HB147.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Subchapter Z, Chapter 2252, Government Code, is amended by adding Section 2252.911 to read as follows: Sec. 2252.911.  PROHIBITED CONSIDERATIONS IN CONTRACTING. (a) In this section, "governmental entity" has the meaning assigned by Section 2252.001. (b)  Notwithstanding any other law, a governmental entity: (1)  may only consider the standard under Section 2155.074 and other merit-based criteria when awarding a contract; and (2)  may not award a contract or provide preferential treatment to a person submitting a bid for a contract on the basis of: (A)  race, color, ethnicity, sex, gender identity, or sexual orientation; or (B)  other criteria established as part of a diversity, equity, and inclusion practice or program. SECTION 2.  Chapter 2161, Government Code, is repealed. SECTION 3.  The repeal by this Act of Chapter 2161, Government Code, does not apply to a transfer of funds directed by the Legislative Budget Board under Section 2161.005, Government Code, before the effective date of this Act. A transfer of funds directed by the Legislative Budget Board before the effective date of this Act is governed by that section as it existed immediately before the effective date of this Act, and the former law is continued in effect for that purpose. SECTION 4.  The changes in law made by this Act apply only to a contract entered into on or after the effective date of this Act. A contract entered into before that date is governed by the law in effect on the date the contract was entered into, and the former law is continued in effect for that purpose. SECTION 5.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.